Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.180

Causing person to violate chapter.

Any person who knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to cause any person to violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a class B felony subject to the penalty in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1991 c 261 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 18.]